Utah statutes.
63C-8-105.   Powers of council.

The council may:

(1)  conduct surveys, with the assistance of the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing within the Department of Commerce, to assess and meet changing market and education needs;

(2)  notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 35A-4-312(3), receive information obtained by the Division of Workforce Information and Payment Services under the provisions of Section 35A-4-312 for purposes consistent with the council's duties as identified under Section 63C-8-104, including identifying changes in the medical and health care workforce numbers, types, and geographic distribution;

(3)  appoint advisory committees of broad representation on interdisciplinary clinical education, workforce mix planning and projections, funding mechanisms, and other topics as is necessary;

(4)  use federal money for necessary administrative expenses to carry out its duties and powers as permitted by federal law;

(5)  distribute program money in accordance with Subsection 63C-8-104(7); and

(6)  as is necessary to carry out its duties under Section 63C-8-104:

(a)  hire employees; and

(b)  adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

